Utah statutes.
30-5-2.   Visitation rights of grandparents.
(1)  Grandparents have standing to bring an action in district court by
petition, requesting visitation in accordance with the provisions and
requirements of this section.  Grandparents may also file a petition for
visitation rights in a pending divorce proceeding or other proceeding
involving custody and visitation issues.
(2)  There is a rebuttable presumption that a parent's decision with regard to
grandparent visitation is in the grandchild's best interests.  However, the
court may override the parent's decision and grant the petitioner reasonable
rights of visitation if the court finds that the petitioner has rebutted the
presumption based upon factors which the court considers to be relevant, such
as whether:
(a)  the petitioner is a fit and proper person to have visitation with the
grandchild;
(b)  visitation with the grandchild has been denied or unreasonably limited;
(c)  the parent is unfit or incompetent;
(d)  the petitioner has acted as the grandchild's custodian or caregiver, or
otherwise has had a substantial relationship with the grandchild, and the loss
or cessation of that relationship is likely to cause harm to the grandchild;
(e)  the petitioner's child, who is a parent of the grandchild, has died, or
has become a noncustodial parent through divorce or legal separation;
(f)  the petitioner's child, who is a parent of the grandchild, has been
missing for an extended period of time; or
(g)  visitation is in the best interest of the grandchild.
(3)  The adoption of a grandchild by the grandchild's stepparent does not
diminish or alter visitation rights previously ordered under this section.
(4)  Subject to the provisions of Subsections (2) and (3), the court may
inquire of the grandchild and take into account the grandchild's desires
regarding visitation.
(5)  On the petition of a grandparent or the legal custodian of a grandchild
the court may, after a hearing, modify an order regarding grandparent
visitation if:
(a)  the circumstances of the grandchild, the grandparent, or the custodian
have materially and substantially changed since the entry of the order to be
modified, or the order has become unworkable or inappropriate under existing
circumstances; and
(b)  the court determines that a modification is appropriate based upon the
factors set forth in Subsection (2).
(6)  Grandparents may petition the court to remedy a parent's wrongful
noncompliance with a visitation order.
